District of Columbia statutes.
50-2637

Unlawfully parked vehicles.

It shall be a violation of Chapter 23 of this title [§  50-2301.01 et seq.] for a person to park, leave unattended, or store a vehicle in violation of posted parking restrictions at a parking facility, as that term is defined in § 50-2602(4), owned by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6012, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 18 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-76, Feb. 27, 2016, 63 DCR 264).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6012 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 9 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Second Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-202, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15276).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 9 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-307, Feb. 18, 2016, 63 DCR 2182).